Hawaii statutes.
§171-28 Government-owned Hawaiian
fishponds; sale prohibition. (a) The board may investigate and develop
scientific commercial management practices for government-owned Hawaiian
fishponds and reconstruct, rehabilitate, improve, and stock the fishponds; and
expend moneys from the special land and development fund. All revenues derived
from any government-owned Hawaiian fishpond shall be deposited in the fund.

(b) The board may lease government-owned Hawaiian
fishponds with legislative authorization as provided under section 171-53(c);
provided that in lieu of legislative authorization, the board may lease such
fishponds if:

(1) A public hearing is conducted on the proposed
lease on the island where the fishpond is located;

(2) The board finds that the proposed lease does not
cause a substantial adverse environmental or ecological impact on the fishpond
or surrounding area; and

(3) The proposed lease is not in violation of
applicable federal, state, or county laws.

(c) Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, the
board may not sell the fee interest in public lands on which government-owned
Hawaiian fishponds are located. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-28; HRS
§171-28; am L 1994, c 69, §1; am L 2010, c 210, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next